Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA TRANSPORTATION MUSEUM.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to the Minnesota Transportation Museum to construct capital improvements to the Minnesota Transportation Museum in the city of St. Paul, including replacing the roof, stabilizing masonry, replacing the roundhouse doors, installing insulation, and making modifications to comply with the Americans with Disabilities Act. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end